Utah statutes.
63L-5-402.   Establishment clause unaffected.

(1)  This chapter does not authorize government to burden a person's free exercise of religion.

(2)  The protection of religious freedom afforded by this chapter is in addition to the protections provided under federal law and the constitutions of Utah and the United States.

(3)  Nothing in this chapter may be construed to affect, interpret, or in any way address that portion of the First Amendment to the United States Constitution prohibiting laws respecting an establishment of religion.

